Utah statutes.
20A-1-206.   Cancellation of local election -- Municipalities -- Local districts -- Notice.

(1)  A municipal legislative body may cancel a local election if:

(a) (i) (A)  all municipal officers are elected in an at-large election under Subsection 10-3-205.5(1); and

(B)  the number of municipal officer candidates, including any eligible write-in candidates under Section 20A-9-601, for the at-large municipal offices does not exceed the number of open at-large municipal offices for which the candidates have filed; or

(ii) (A)  the municipality has adopted an ordinance under Subsection 10-3-205.5(2);

(B)  the number of municipal officer candidates, including any eligible write-in candidates under Section 20A-9-601, for the at-large municipal offices, if any, does not exceed the number of open at-large municipal offices for which the candidates have filed; and

(C)  each municipal officer candidate, including any eligible write-in candidates under Section 20A-9-601, in each district is unopposed;

(b)  there are no other municipal ballot propositions; and

(c)  the municipal legislative body passes, no later than 20 days before the day of the scheduled election, a resolution that cancels the election and certifies that:

(i)  each municipal officer candidate is:

(A)  unopposed; or

(B)  a candidate for an at-large municipal office for which the number of candidates does not exceed the number of open at-large municipal offices; and

(ii)  a candidate described in Subsection (1)(c)(i) is considered to be elected to office.

(2)  A municipal legislative body that cancels a local election in accordance with Subsection (1) shall give notice that the election is cancelled by posting notice:

(a)  subject to Subsection (5), on the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website as described in Section 20A-7-801 for 15 consecutive days before the day of the scheduled election;

(b)  if the municipality has a public website, on the municipality's public website for 15 days before the day of the scheduled election;

(c)  if the municipality publishes a newsletter or other periodical, in the next scheduled newsletter or other periodical published before the day of the scheduled election; and

(d) (i)  at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation within the municipality before the day of the scheduled election; or

(ii)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the municipality, in at least three conspicuous places within the boundaries of the municipality at least 10 days before the day of the scheduled election.

(3)  A local district board may cancel an election as described in Section 17B-1-306 if:

(a) (i) (A)  any local district officers are elected in an at-large election; and

(B)  the number of local district officer candidates for the at-large local district offices, including any eligible write-in candidates under Section 20A-9-601, does not exceed the number of open at-large local district offices for which the candidates have filed; or

(ii) (A)  the local district has divided the local district into divisions under Section 17B-1-306.5;

(B)  the number of local district officer candidates, including any eligible write-in candidates under Section 20A-9-601, for the at-large local district offices within the local district, if any, does not exceed the number of open at-large local district offices for which the candidates have filed; and

(C)  each local district officer candidate, including any eligible write-in candidates under Section 20A-9-601, in each division of the local district is unopposed;

(b)  there are no other local district ballot propositions; and

(c)  the local district governing body, no later than 20 days before the day of the scheduled election, adopts a resolution that cancels the election and certifies that:

(i)  each local district officer candidate is:

(A)  unopposed; or

(B)  a candidate for an at-large local district office for which the number of candidates does not exceed the number of open at-large local district offices; and

(ii)  a candidate described in Subsection (3)(c)(i) is considered to be elected to office.

(4)  A local district that cancels a local election in accordance with Subsection (3) shall give notice that the election is cancelled by posting notice:

(a)  subject to Subsection (5), on the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website as described in Section 20A-7-801 for 15 consecutive days before the day of the scheduled election;

(b)  if the local district has a public website, on the local district's public website for 15 days before the day of the scheduled election;

(c)  if the local district publishes a newsletter or other periodical, in the next scheduled newsletter or other periodical published before the day of the scheduled election; and

(d) (i)  at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation within the local district before the day of the scheduled election; or

(ii)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the local district, in at least three conspicuous places within the boundaries of the local district at least 10 days before the day of the scheduled election.

(5)  A municipal legislative body that posts a notice in accordance with Subsection (2)(a) or a local district that posts a notice in accordance with Subsection (4)(a) is not liable for a notice that fails to post due to technical or other error by the publisher of the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website.



Amended by Chapter 97, 2012 General Session

